Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-908
Surplus property; advertisement for and submission of bids not necessary.

In making purchases under sections 81-907 to 81-909, it shall not be necessary to first advertise for and require submission of bids.

Laws 1945, c. 234, § 2, p. 693.